Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4735.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 801l. (1) Beginning on January 1, 2027, every operator, owner, or owner-operator who drives a motor vehicle that has a combined weight of 59,999 pounds or more on a public highway of this state, in addition to the payment of any registration fees owed under section 801, shall do all of the following: (a) Report quarterly to the secretary of state the number of miles driven in this state, rounded to the nearest whole number, on a form approved by the secretary of state. (b) Pay a quarterly weight distance fee of $0.0285 per mile based on the miles reported in subdivision (a). (2) On request and payment of a $40.00 fee by an operator, owner, or owner-operator of a motor vehicle subject to subsection (1) on a form approved by the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall issue a 10-day, unlimited-mile pass that exempts the motor vehicle from the reporting requirement under subsection (1)(a) and the weight distance fee under subsection (1)(b) for the 10-day period the pass is in effect. (3) An operator, owner, or owner-operator that fails to comply with the quarterly reporting requirement under subsection (1)(a) is, in addition to the amount owed under subsection (1)(b), responsible to pay a fine equal to 2% of the estimated weight distance fee under subsection (1)(b), as calculated by the sectary of state based on the information in its possession, or $100.00, whichever is more. (4) An operator, owner, or owner-operator that intentionally misrepresents the miles driven in this state under subsection (1)(a) is, in addition to the amount owed under subsection (1)(b), responsible to pay a fine equal to 50% of the weight distance fee owed under subsection (1)(b). (5) An operator, owner, or owner-operator that fails to make a complete payment under subsection (1)(b) is, in addition to the original amount owed under subsection (1)(b), responsible to pay a fine equal to 2% of the weight distance fee owed under subsection (1)(b) for every 30 days that the weight distance fee is late. The fine assessed under this subsection must not exceed 20% of the total amount due and must not be less than $10.00. If it is established that the delay was due to accident or reasonable cause, the department shall waive the fine under this section. (6) An operator, owner, or owner-operator that refuses to make a payment under subsection (1)(b) and has a payment that is more than 60 days late is, in addition to the original amount owed under subsection (1)(b), responsible to pay a fine equal to 2% of the weight distance fee owed under subsection (1)(b) for every 30 days that the weight distance fee is late. (7) The fine amounts assessed under subsections (3) to (6) accrue interest for every 30-day period the fines are not paid in full. The secretary of state shall use the adjusted prime rate to determine the interest rate for the fines under subsections (3) to (6). As used in this section, "adjusted prime rate" means that term as defined in section 23 of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.23.